Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4502
Purpose of act.

The purposes of the Long-Term Care Insurance Act are to promote the public interest, to promote the availability of long-term care insurance policies, to protect applicants for long-term care insurance from unfair or deceptive sales or enrollment practices, to establish standards for long-term care insurance, to facilitate public understanding and comparison of long-term care insurance policies, and to facilitate flexibility and innovation in the development of long-term care insurance coverage.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 2.